District of Columbia statutes.
1-142

Requirements as to display.

The flag of the District of Columbia shall be displayed in the same manner, at the same time, and on the same occasions as the flag of the United States is displayed in the District of Columbia pursuant to and consistent with federal law.

July 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-121, § 3, 29 DCR 2072
1981 Ed., § 1-122.